incubator/apertium-hi-ur.ur.dix
    <pardef n="بھوت__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/آخر__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آخر</l>
          <r>آخر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آخر</l>
          <r>آخر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اَواخِر</l>
          <r>آخر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اَواخِر</l>
          <r>آخر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="قطع__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ے</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ے</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ے</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="لطافت__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="خط__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="سعادت"><i>سعادت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جاٹ"><i>جاٹ</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نصیحت"><i>نصیحت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="برکت"><i>برکت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="برقع"><i>برقع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بخت"><i>بخت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کالج"><i>کالج</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حلاوت"><i>حلاوت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ضلع"><i>ضلع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="غار"><i>غار</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کترن"><i>کترن</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="عادت"><i>عادت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مقطع"><i>مقطع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تنازع"><i>تنازع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سلیپر"><i>سلیپر</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مجموع"><i>مجموع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مصبت"><i>مصبت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فقر"><i>فقر</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سات"><i>سات</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آواز"><i>آواز</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="صندوق"><i>صندوق</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گال"><i>گال</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کاٹن"><i>کاٹن</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مرقع"><i>مرقع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کمبل"><i>کمبل</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فقیر"><i>فقیر</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تعویذ"><i>تعویذ</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سکت"><i>سکت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ملت"><i>ملت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="صعوبت"><i>صعوبت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بُرْقَع"><i>بُرْقَع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اذان"><i>اذان</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ساعت"><i>ساعت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="عبادت"><i>عبادت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="انگور"><i>انگور</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="میل"><i>میل</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تالاب"><i>تالاب</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ٹائر"><i>ٹائر</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="قطع"><i>قطع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بال"><i>بال</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="صورت"><i>صورت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شرارت"><i>شرارت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سگرٹ"><i>سگرٹ</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="لطافت"><i>لطافت</i><par n="لطافت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سنت"><i>سنت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کیبن"><i>کیبن</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مماثلت"><i>مماثلت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="واقع"><i>واقع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="منبع"><i>منبع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نوشت"><i>نوشت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ہمت"><i>ہمت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فرصت"><i>فرصت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="لذّت"><i>لذّت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بلب"><i>بلب</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مطلع"><i>مطلع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پشت"><i>پشت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مربع"><i>مربع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="وعظ"><i>وعظ</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اسماء"><i>اسماء</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مواقع"><i>مواقع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خدمت"><i>خدمت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مصرع"><i>مصرع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بینک"><i>بینک</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ستار"><i>ستار</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مجمع"><i>مجمع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="قنات"><i>قنات</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کاتب"><i>کاتب</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اسٹول"><i>اسٹول</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="موقع"><i>موقع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دیہات"><i>دیہات</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="امت"><i>امت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جبلت"><i>جبلت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آخر"><i></i><par n="/آخر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حرف"><i>حرف</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بنچ"><i>بنچ</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شخصیت"><i>شخصیت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بھوت"><i>بھوت</i><par n="بھوت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="منافع"><i>منافع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حد"><i>حد</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مسرت"><i>مسرت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جنات"><i>جنات</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مشقت"><i>مشقت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جھاڑ"><i>جھاڑ</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="قلع"><i>قلع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گرد"><i>گرد</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مطالع"><i>مطالع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="قباحت"><i>قباحت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آہٹ"><i>آہٹ</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="لذت"><i>لذت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دالان"><i>دالان</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
    <e lm="صنعت"><i>صنعت</i><par n="خط__n"/></e>
